Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,166
Alcoholic liquor; chemical test; unconscious person; effect on consent.

Any person who is unconscious or who is in a condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal to submit to a chemical test or tests pursuant to section 60-4,164 shall be deemed not to have withdrawn the consent provided for in such section, and a chemical test or tests may be given.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 116;

Laws 1993, LB 191, § 4.